Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1803
Inquest; warrant; execution.

The sheriff shall execute the warrant and make return thereof at the time and place therein named.

Laws 1879, § 99, p. 381;

R.S.1913, § 5665;

C.S.1922, § 4995;

C.S.1929, § 26-1504;

R.S.1943, § 23-1803;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 9.